nb: Spisepinne-stil: Kinesisk; Japansk; Koreansk; Thai; Tibetansk; Vietnamesisk; Annet
lt-LT: Lazdelių stilius: Kinų; Japonų; Korėjiečių; Tajų; Tibetiečių; Vietnamiečių; Kita
hr-HR: Stil štapića za jelo: Kineska; Japanski; Korejski; Tajlandski; Tibetanski; Vijetnamski; Ostalo
sk-SK: Štýl paličiek: Čínsky; Japonský; Kórejský; Thajský; Tibetský; Vietnamský; Iné
ru: Стиль палочек для еды: Китайская; Японская; Корейская; Тайская; Тибетская; Вьетнамская; Другая
pt-BR: Estilo do hashi: Chinês; Japonês; Coreano; Tailandês; Tibetano; Vietnamita; Outro
th: รูปแบบตะเกียบ: แบบจีน; แบบญี่ปุ่น; แบบเกาหลี; แบบไทย; แบบทิเบต; แบบเวียดนาม; อื่นๆ
ja: 箸のスタイル: 中国式; 日本式; 韓国式; タイ式; チベット式; ベトナム式; その他
bg-BG: Стил на клечки за хранене: Китайски; Японски; Корейски; Тайландски; Тибетски; Виетнамски; Друго
de: Essstäbchenstil: Chinesisch; Japanisch; Koreanisch; Thailändisch; Tibetisch; Vietnamesisch; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 筷子样式: 中式; 日式; 韩式; 泰式; 藏式; 越南式; 其他
tr: Yemek çubuğu stili: Çin; Japon; Kore; Tayland; Tibet; Vietnam; Diğer
fr: Style de baguettes: Chinois; Japonais; Coréen; Thai; Tibetan; Vietnamien; Autre
sl-SI: Slog jedilnih palčk: Kitajska; Japonščina; Korejščina; Tajščina; Tibetanščina; Vietnamščina; Druga
es: Estilo de palillos: Chino; Japonés; Coreano; Tailandés; Tibetano; Vietnamita; Otros
ro-RO: Stil bețișoare: Chinezesc; Japonez; Coreean; Thailandez; Tibetan; Vietnamez; Altele
nl: Eetstokjesstijl: Chinees; Japans; Koreaans; Thais; Tibetaans; Vietnamees; Overig
pt-PT: Estilo pauzinho: Chinês; Japonês; Coreano; Tailandês; Tibetano; Vietnamita; Outro
it: Stile bacchette: Cinese; Giapponese; Coreano; Tailandese; Tibetano; Vietnamita; Altro
en: Chopstick style: Chinese; Japanese; Korean; Thai; Tibetan; Vietnamese; Other
da: Spisepindes stil: Kinesisk; Japansk; Koreansk; Thai; Tibetansk; Vietnamesisk; Andet
zh-TW: 筷子風格: 中式; 日式; 韓式; 泰式; 西藏式; 越南式; 其他
ko: 젓가락 스타일: 중국어; 일본어; 한국어; 태국어; 티베트어; 베트남어; 기타
vi: Kiểu dáng đũa: Tiếng Trung; Tiếng Nhật; Tiếng Hàn; Tiếng Thái; Tiếng Tây Tạng; Tiếng Việt; Khác
el: Στυλ chopstick: Κινεζικά; Ιαπωνικά; Κορεατικά; Ταϊλανδέζικα; Θιβετιανά; Βιετναμέζικα; Άλλο
fi: Syömäpuikkojen tyyli: Kiinalainen; Japanilainen; Korealainen; Thaimaalainen; Tiibetiläinen; Vietnamilainen; Muu
cs: Styl jídelních hůlek: Čínské; Japonské; Korejské; Thajské; Tibetské; Vietnamské; Jiné
hu: Evőpálcika stílus: Kínai; Japán; Koreai; Thai; Tibeti; Vietnámi; Egyéb
pl: Typ pałeczek: Chińskie; Japońskie; Koreańskie; Tajskie; Tybetańskie; Wietnamskie; Pozostałe
sv: Design av ätpinnar: Kinesiska; Japanska; Koreanska; Thai; Tibetanska; Vietnamesiska; Övrigt